Maine, session 132, LD1385.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §76 is enacted to read:
§76. Awarding of discretionary grants
The department shall consider a municipality's past actions and future plans toward
meeting regional housing production goals as described in Title 5, section 13056,
subsection 9 when considering the award of discretionary grants.